Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1777.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; AFRICAN-AMERICAN-FOCUSED HOMEPLACE.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for a grant to the Birth Justice Collaborative to strengthen and implement the current model of the African-American-focused Homeplace in Hennepin County. The purpose of the model is to improve access to culturally centered healing and care during pregnancy and the postpartum period, with the goal of improving maternal and child health outcomes. By December 15, 2026, or 12 months after distribution of the grant under this section, whichever is later, the Birth Justice Collaborative must report to the commissioner of health on the implementation and progress of Homeplace in Hennepin County. The report must outline outcomes achieved and recommendations for future funding and program expansion. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028. new text end